Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Chapter 4. Job Service.

§ 60.2-400.
Virginia State Job Service; cooperation with U.S. Employment Service agencies.

The Commission shall have all rights, powers and duties with respect to the establishment, maintenance and operation of free employment offices in the Commonwealth and shall possess, exercise and perform the same through a division known as the Virginia State Job Service. The Commission through the division shall establish and maintain free public employment offices in such number and in such places as may be necessary for the proper administration of this title.

The Commission through the Virginia State Job Service, is designated as the state agency and vested with all powers necessary to cooperate with the United States Employment Service in accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in Chapter 4B (§ 49 et seq.) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

The Commission may cooperate with or enter into agreements with the Railroad Retirement Board, or any other agency of the United States charged with the administration of an unemployment compensation law, with respect to the maintenance and use of free employment service facilities.

Chapter 13 of the Acts of Assembly of 1933 providing for cooperation between the Commonwealth and the United States Employment Service is, subject to the provisions of this chapter, continued in effect.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 60-85, 60-87, 60-89; 1968, c. 738, §§ 60.1-101, 60.1-103, 60.1-105; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-400.1.
Human trafficking hotline; posted notice required.

Within each employment office, the Commission shall post notice of the existence of a human trafficking hotline to alert possible witnesses or victims of human trafficking to the availability of a means to report crimes or gain assistance. The notice required by this section shall (i) be posted in a place readily visible and accessible to the public and (ii) meet the requirements specified in subsection C of §

40.1-11.3

.

History.

2019, c. 388.

§ 60.2-401.
Financial literacy courses.

The Commission, either by itself or in collaboration with workforce service partner entities, shall provide information to all claimants and job seekers on courses in financial literacy. Such courses shall be at no cost to claimants and to job seekers and may be offered online or in any other medium the Commission deems appropriate.

History.

2014, c. 449.